Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6722
Administration of medication; by whom.

Administration of medication may be done by competent individuals to themselves, by caretakers of recipients receiving medication, or by licensed health care professionals for whom administration of medication is included in their scope of practice.

A medication aide, a person licensed to operate a child care facility or a staff member of a child care facility, or a staff member of a school may participate in medication administration, when directed and monitored by a competent individual, caretaker, or health care professional, by providing medications in compliance with the Medication Aide Act and rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act. In each case, the individual responsible for providing direction and monitoring shall be identified in writing and indication that such individual has accepted such responsibility shall also be identified in writing.

Laws 1998, LB 1354, § 12.